Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB76.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "doctor of osteopathy or osteopathic doctor" and "primary supervising physician" in section 2 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819 * * *"Doctor of osteopathy or osteopathic doctor." An individual licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery by the State Board of Osteopathic [Medical Examiners.] Medicine under the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act . * * *"Primary supervising physician." A medical doctor who is [registered with the board and] licensed by the board or a doctor of osteopathy or osteopathic doctor who is licensed by the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine and is designated in a written agreement with a physician assistant under section 13(e) as having primary responsibility for supervising the physician assistant.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 180 days.20250HB0076PN3515 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516